Vermont, session 2025-2026, H421.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. chapter 121, subchapter 7 is added to read:
Subchapter 7. Regional Council of Governments
§ 4948. CREATION OF REGIONAL COUNCIL OF GOVERNMENTS
(a) On or before July 1, 2027, every regional planning commission shall
enter into an agreement between or among its municipalities to establish a
regional council of governments.
(b) The agreement shall:
VT LEG #380489 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.421
2025 Page 2 of 5
(1) provide that its representatives be elected municipal officials from
member municipalities; and
(2) specify the organization, method of withdrawal, method of
terminating the agreement, and the grounds for suspension of member
municipalities.
(c) The council shall adopt bylaws designating the officers of the council
and providing for the conduct of its business.
(d) On or before January 1, 2027, the Secretary of Commerce and
Community Development and representatives from each regional planning
commission shall meet and develop a process for determining the number of
councils of government in the State and how many municipalities should be in
each.
§ 4949. FINANCES; STAFF
(a) Expenses. The legislative bodies of the member municipalities may
appropriate funds to meet the expenses of the council.
(b) Funds. The council may accept funds, grants, gifts, and services from:
(1) the federal government;
(2) the State of Vermont or its agencies, departments, or
instrumentalities;
(3) any other governmental unit, whether a member of the council or
not; and
VT LEG #380489 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.421
2025 Page 3 of 5
(4) private and civic sources.
(c) Staff. The council may employ any staff and consult and retain any
experts that it considers necessary.
§ 4950. POWERS AND DUTIES
(a) The council may:
(1) Assist local governments in planning for common need and mutual
benefit through cooperation and coordination. The council may undertake
activities that it considers appropriate, including engineering, inspectional and
planning services, economic development, public safety, emergency
management, animal control, land use management, tourism promotion, social,
health, education, data management, regional sewerage, housing, mapping,
household hazardous waste collection, recycling, public facility siting,
coordination of master planning, vocational training and development, solid
waste disposal, fire protection, regional resource protection, regional impact
studies, and transportation.
(2) Promote cooperative arrangements and coordinate action among its
members, including arrangements and actions with respect to planning,
community development, joint purchasing, intermunicipal services, and
infrastructure.
(3) Make recommendations for review and action to its members and
other public agencies that perform functions within the region.
VT LEG #380489 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.421
2025 Page 4 of 5
(b) The council, on behalf of a majority of its member municipalities, may
exercise any power, privilege, or authority capable of exercise by a member
municipality and necessary or desirable for dealing with problems of local or
regional concern, except essential legislative powers, taxing authority, or
eminent domain power. This authority is in addition to any other authority
granted to regional planning commissions in statute.
(c) Where a regional planning commission has been established, the
member municipalities, by appropriate action, may provide for the transfer of
all assets, liabilities, rights, and obligations of the commission to the council
and provide for the dissolution of the commission.
§ 4950a. INTERCOUNCIL COMMITTEES AND STAFF SHARING
(a) Two or more regional councils of governments may establish one or
more intercouncil committees to recommend policies relating to matters of an
interregional nature, provided each participating council shall have first
adopted a resolution authorizing establishment of any such intercouncil
committees and defining the scope of its duties.
(b) Two or more regional councils of governments may share staff and staff
from one council may work in the area of another council, provided each
council involved in such a cooperative effort shall have first adopted a
resolution authorizing such action and specifying the extent of cooperation and
the terms under which it is to be provided.
VT LEG #380489 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.421
2025 Page 5 of 5
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380489 v.2